lang/id/src/hyph-id.hyp.txt
pe-rong-ga-an
pe-rong-rong
pe-ti-a
pe-tu-ni-a
pem-ba-u
pem-be-o
pem-bu-nu-han
pen-te-ra-fo-bi-a
peng--an
peng-a-ram
peng-a-rang-an
peng-a-wa-ba-u
peng-alih-tu-gas-an
peng-an-tar-an
peng-ek-strak
peng-eks-trak-si
peng-in-ter-vi-u
peng-in-til
peng-u-lak
peng-u-rus
per--an
per-a-wan-an
per-ang-ka-an
per-de-o
per-se-ve-ra-si
per-si-a
per-so-na-li-a
per-tu-a
pet-ro-fi-li-a
pet-ro-ki-mi-a
pi-di-e
pi-e-zo-ki-mi-a
pi-go-fi-li-a
pi-rek-si-a
pi-rek-si-o-fo-bi-a
pi-ro-fo-bi-a
pi-ro-ma-ni-a
pi-u-ri-a
piut-miut
pla-ko-fo-bi-a
pla-na-ri-a
pla-te-a
plu-ral-is-tik
plu-to-fo-bi-a
plu-vi-o-fo-bi-a
plu-vi-o-skop
pne-u-ma-ti-fo-bi-a
pne-u-mo-ni-a
pni-ge-ro-fo-bi-a
pni-go-fo-bi-a
po-do-fo-bi-a
po-go-no-fo-bi-a
po-i-ne-fo-bi-a
po-la-ri-skop
po-lan-di-a
po-li-dip-si-a
po-li-fa-gi-a
po-li-ne-si-a
po-li-o
po-li-si-te-mi-a
po-li-ti-ko-fo-bi-a
po-li-u-ri-a
po-ta-mo-fo-bi-a
po-ti-a
po-to-fo-bi-a
pok-res-ko-fo-bi-a
por-fi-ri-a
por-fi-ro-fo-bi-a
por-to-fo-li-o
pra-mu-ri-a
pra-se-ti-a
pre-ek-lam-si-a
pres-bi-o-pi-a
pri-a
pro-ble-ma-tik
pro-de-o
pro-mi-nen-si-a
pro-so-fo-bi-a
pro-so-pag-no-si-a
pro-te-i-nu-ri-a
pro-tu-be-ran-si-a
prob-le-ma-ti-ka
prok-to-fo-bi-a
pros-to-don-si-a
pse-lis-mo-fo-bi-a
pse-u-do-de-men-si-a
pse-u-do-gi-ne-ko-mas-ti-a
psi-ko-fo-bi-a
psi-ko-log-is-me
pte-ri-do-fo-bi-a
pte-ro-mer-ha-no-fo-bi-a
pte-ro-no-fo-bi-a
pu-ni-a
pu-o
pu-pa-fo-bi-a
push-up
ra-di-kal-is-me
ra-di-o
ra-di-o-fo-bi-a
ra-di-o-go-ni-o-met-ri
ra-di-o-ki-mi-a
ra-di-o-me-te-o-ro-lo-gi
ra-fi-a
ra-ha-si-a
ra-i
ra-ma-ni-a
ra-ni-da-fo-bi-a
ra-si-o
ra-tum-ba-nu-a
ra-u
ra-zi-a
raf-le-si-a
rah-si-a
re-a
re-a-gen-si-a
re-gi-o
re-i
re-me-ni-a
re-o-fi-li-a
re-vi-u
reg-ga-e
rek-to-fo-bi-a
rep-ti-li-a
res-to-ma-ni-a
res-ve-rat-rol
ret-ro-fi-li-a
ri-ket-si-a
ro-ne-o
ro-sa-ri-o
ro-sa-se-a
ru-a
ru-ma-ni-a
ru-me-ni-a
ru-mi-nan-si-a
ru-si-a
rum-bi-a
sa-i
sa-lin-di-a
sa-ta-no-fo-bi-a
sak-ra-men-ta-li-a
san-se-vi-e-ri-a
sang-ri-a
sar-ko-fi-li-a
sar-ko-pe-ni-a
sat-ri-a
savoi-faire
savoi-vivre
se-ba-ha-gi-a
se-ba-u
se-bar-an
se-be-ra-pa
se-ce-ri-a
se-cen-de-ki-a
se-du-ni-a
se-la-fo-bi-a
se-la-ko-fo-bi-a
se-lang-seli
se-le-no-fo-bi-a
se-le-o
se-li-a
se-li-u
se-ma-u
se-mi-ki-mi-a
se-mu-a
se-na-ri-o
se-no-fo-bi-a
se-no-glo-so-fo-bi-a
se-pa-di-a
se-per-du-a
se-re-a-li-a
se-ta-ri-a
se-te-ri-a
se-ti-a
se-tu-a
sek-so-fo-bi-a
sek-som-ni-a
selap-selip
selit-belit
selit-sepit
sem-be-rap
senget-menget
senguk-sengak
sep-ti-se-mi-a
ser-ba-du-a
serak-serik
serak-seruk
sfek-so-fo-bi-a
si-a
si-a-no-fo-bi-a
si-a-si-a
si-ber-fo-bi-a
si-bo-fo-bi-a
si-de-ro-fo-bi-a
si-de-ro-pe-ni-a
si-de-rod-ro-mo-fo-bi-a
si-fi-lo-fo-bi-a
si-li-a
si-met-ro-fo-bi-a
si-meu-lu-e
si-mo-fo-bi-a
si-ne-fi-li-a
si-ne-ki-a
si-nes-te-si-a
si-nge-ne-so-fo-bi-a
si-nis-tro-fo-bi-a
si-no-fi-li-a
si-no-vi-a
si-o
si-pe-ra-se-a-e
si-to-fo-bi-a
si-to-ki-mi-a
si-to-ma-ni-a
sidik-midik
sik-lo-fo-bi-a
sim-bo-lo-fo-bi-a
sim-bu-a
sim-pli-si-a
sin-ci-a
sin-tu-a
sinar-x
sip-ri-do-fo-bi-a
ska-bi-o-fo-bi-a
skan-di-na-vi-a
ske-le-ro-fo-bi-a
ske-na-ri-o
ski-o-fi-li-a
ski-o-fo-bi-a
ski-zo-fre-ni-a
sko-li-o-no-fo-bi-a
sko-po-fo-bi-a
sko-ri-a
sko-to-ma-fo-bi-a
sko-to-pi-a
skor-pi-o
slash-and-burn
slo-ve-ni-a
slo-wa-ki-a
so-a
so-do-mi-a
so-e
so-ma-li-a
so-se-ra-fo-bi-a
so-si-al-fo-bi-a
so-si-o-fo-bi-a
so-te-ri-o-fo-bi-a
som-ni-fo-bi-a
spa-se-fo-bi-a
spas-mo-fi-li-a
spek-tro-fo-bi-a
spek-tro-fo-to-met-ri
spek-tro-he-li-o-skop
spek-tro-ki-mi-a
sper-ma-to-fo-bi-a
sper-mo-fo-bi-a
sta-u-ro-fo-bi-a
ste-go-fi-li-a
ste-no-fo-bi-a
ste-re-o
ste-re-o-ki-mi-a
ste-to-re-a
ste-vi-a
stig-ma-to-fi-li-a
sto-i-kio-met-rik
stu-di-o
su-a
su-a-su-a
su-i-po-a
su-ka-ri-a
su-per-be-nu-a
su-po-si-to-ri-a
su-ri-fo-bi-a
sum-pi-a
susup-sasap
swe-di-a
sya-fi-i
ta-bi-a
ta-bi-i
ta-e-i-no-fo-bi-a
ta-fe-fo-bi-a
ta-fi-a
ta-fo-fo-bi-a
ta-i
ta-ji-o
ta-ki-kar-di-a
ta-kip-ne-a
ta-ko-fo-bi-a
ta-la-se-mi-a
ta-la-so-fi-li-a
ta-la-so-fo-bi-a
ta-ma-ga-ri-o
ta-na-to-fo-bi-a
ta-ni-a
ta-o
ta-pi-no-fo-bi-a
ta-so-fo-bi-a
ta-su-a
ta-u-ro-fo-bi-a
tak-ce-ri-a
tak-ter-se-di-a
tali-tali
tan-di-a
tan-za-ni-a
tang-ku-e
tar-fi-a
tarik-ulur
te-ber-kah-i
te-deum
te-fe-u
te-ku-a
te-le-fo-no-fo-bi-a
te-le-o-fo-bi-a
te-le-ste-si-a
te-o-fo-bi-a
te-o-lo-gi-ko-fo-bi-a
te-o-ma-ni-a
te-ra-suk-i
te-ra-to-fo-bi-a
te-ra-to-zo-o-sper-mi-a
te-ra-zi-a
te-ta-no-fo-bi-a
te-tu-a
tek-no-fi-li-a
tek-no-fo-bi-a
tem-pu-a
ter-a-dil-i
ter-ak-tu-al-i-sa-si
ter-ang-kat
ter-ang-kut
ter-ba-u
ter-ban-jir-i
ter-ber-kah-i
ter-cu-kup-i
ter-fa-si-li-tas-i
ter-ha-kim-i
ter-ing-kar-i
ter-lam-pau-i
ter-ma-e
ter-ma-es-te-si-a
ter-mo-fi-li-a
ter-mo-fo-bi-a
ter-mo-ki-mi-a
ter-mu-li-a
ter-pen-car-pencar
ter-se-di-a
ter-su-a
ter-su-dah-i
ter-ta-ngan-i
ter-tang-gu-lang-i
ter-tu-a
tes-to-fo-bi-a
tet-ra-sik-lin
ti-bi-a
ti-lan-si-a
ti-ne-a
ti-ong-ho-a
ti-ta-ni-a
tif-lo-fi-li-a
tik-so-fo-bi-a
tim-bro-fi-li-a
to-ba-ko-fi-li-a
to-ko-fo-bi-a
to-lu-be-a
to-mo-fo-bi-a
to-ni-tro-fo-bi-a
to-po-fo-bi-a
to-ro-mi-a
tok-se-mi-a
tok-si-fo-bi-a
ton-se-a
ton-sur-fo-bi-a
tra-ke-a
trans-di-fe-ren-si-a
trans-pri-a
trau-ma-to-fo-bi-a
tri-ko-fo-bi-a
tri-ko-pa-to-fo-bi-a
tri-ko-ti-lo-ma-ni-a
tri-o
tri-pa-no-fo-bi-a
tri-po-fo-bi-a
tri-pra-se-ti-a
tri-san-di-a
tri-vi-a
tris-ka-i-de-ka-fo-bi-a
tro-ke-a
trom-bo-si-te-mi-a
trom-bo-si-to-pe-ni-a
tse-tse
tu-a
tu-a-tu-a
tu-ber-ku-lo-fo-bi-a
tu-ni-si-a
tu-ro-fi-li-a
u-a
u-ai
u-ak
u-an
u-an-da
u-ang
u-ang-u-ang-an
u-ap
u-ap-an
u-ar
u-ar-u-ar
u-ba
u-ba-ya
u-bah
u-bah-an
u-bal-u-bal
u-ban
u-ban-an
u-bang
u-bar
u-bat
u-be
u-bek
u-bek-u-bek-an
u-bel
u-bel-u-bel
u-ber
u-ber-an
u-ber-sek-su-al
u-bet
u-bha-ra
u-bi
u-bi-ki-tas
u-bi-ku-i-non
u-bi-ku-i-tas
u-bi-nus
u-bin
u-bit
u-bu-di-ah
u-bub
u-bub-an
u-bun-u-bun
u-bung
u-bur-u-bur
u-cap
u-cap-an
u-cek
u-ceng
u-ci-u-ci
u-cis
u-cok
u-cu
u-cus
u-da
u-da-ni
u-da-ra
u-dai
u-dak
u-dam
u-dang
u-dap
u-dap-u-dap-an
u-dar
u-de
u-de-ma
u-deh
u-dek
u-del
u-deng
u-det
u-di
u-dik
u-dim
u-do
u-don
u-du
u-duh
u-duk
u-dur
u-dut
u-dut-an
u-ek
u-fo-lo-gi
u-fuk
u-ga
u-ga-ha-ri
u-gal-u-gal-an
u-gan-da
u-gem
u-ger
u-ger-an
u-get-u-get
u-gi
u-gik
u-gu
u-gup
u-gut
u-gut-an
u-ham-ka
u-hu
u-ik
u-ir-u-ir
u-is
u-it
u-ja
u-ja-na
u-jang
u-jar
u-jar-an
u-jar-u-jar
u-ji
u-ji-an
u-ju
u-jub
u-jud
u-jug-u-jug
u-juk
u-jul
u-jung
u-jung-an
u-jung-u-jung-nya
u-ka-re
u-kal
u-kas
u-kel
u-khu-ah
u-ki
u-kik
u-kir
u-kir-an
u-kir-meng-u-kir
u-kir-u-kir-an
u-ku-le-le
u-kup
u-kup-an
u-kur
u-kur-an
u-la-ma
u-la-ted
u-la-u-la
u-la-yah
u-la-yat
u-lah
u-lak
u-lak-an
u-lak-u-lak
u-lam
u-lam-an
u-lam-u-lam
u-lan
u-lang
u-lang-a-ling
u-lang-alik
u-lang-an
u-lang-u-lang
u-lap-u-lap
u-lar
u-lar-u-lar
u-lar-u-lar-an
u-las
u-las-an
u-lat
u-lek
u-lek-an
u-lem
u-lem-an
u-len
u-ler
u-les
u-let
u-li
u-lik
u-lin
u-ling
u-lir
u-lir-an
u-lit
u-long
u-los
u-lu
u-lu-ai
u-lu-ba-lang
u-lu-ku-tek
u-lu-man-da
u-lu-nga
u-lu-tum-ba
u-lu-u-lu
u-luh-u-luh
u-lul-ab-sar
u-lul-al-bab
u-lul-am-ri
u-lul-az-mi
u-lul-il-mi
u-lun
u-lung
u-lung-u-lung
u-lup
u-lur
u-lur-an
u-lur-u-lur
u-ma
u-ma-la-sa
u-ma-mi
u-ma-ra
u-mak
u-man
u-mang-u-mang
u-mat
u-me
u-mi
u-mih-an
u-mu
u-muk
u-mul-ki-tab
u-mum
u-mum-nya
u-mun
u-mur
u-na
u-na-ir
u-nah
u-nak
u-nam
u-nand
u-nej
u-nek-u-nek
u-ngah-a-ngih
u-ngam
u-ngap-u-ngap
u-ngar
u-ngu
u-ngu-is
u-ni-ang
u-ni-at
u-ni-braw
u-ni-da
u-ni-fi-ka-si
u-ni-for-mi-tas
u-ni-form
u-ni-korn
u-ni-la
u-ni-la-te-ral
u-ni-li-ne-al
u-ni-li-ne-ar
u-ni-ma
u-ni-med
u-ni-on
u-ni-pas
u-ni-se-luler
u-ni-seks
u-ni-si-rau
u-ni-ta-ris
u-ni-tar-is-me
u-ni-ter
u-ni-va-len
u-ni-ver-sa-li-a
u-ni-ver-sa-li-tas
u-ni-ver-sal
u-ni-ver-sal-is-me
u-ni-ver-si-a-de
u-ni-ver-si-tas
u-ni-ver-si-ter
u-ni-ver-si-tet
u-ni-ver-sum
u-ni-vol-tin
u-nib
u-nik
u-nir
u-nit
u-nu-rum
u-nud
u-nung
u-nus
u-nyai
u-nyil
u-nyu
u-pa-bo-ga
u-pa-ca-ra
u-pa-du-ta
u-pa-ji-wa
u-pa-ka-ra
u-pa-kar-ti
u-pa-nis-had
u-pa-pan-ji
u-pa-sa-ka
u-pa-si-ka
u-pa-wa-sa
u-pa-wi-ta
u-pa-ya
u-pah
u-pah-an
u-pah-me-ng-u-pah
u-pak
u-pal
u-pam
u-pam-an
u-pan
u-par
u-pas
u-pau
u-pe-ti
u-peh
u-pet
u-pi
u-pih
u-pih-u-pih
u-pik
u-pil
u-puk
u-ra
u-ra-e-mi-a
u-ra-kus
u-ra-mir
u-ra-ni-um
u-ra-no-fo-bi-a
u-ra-no-lo-gi
u-ra-nus
u-ra-u-ra
u-rah
u-rai
u-rai-an
u-rak
u-rak-an
u-ram
u-ran-is-me
u-ran-u-ran
u-rang
u-rang-a-ring
u-rang-ka
u-rap
u-rap-an
u-ras
u-rat
u-re-a
u-re-a-me-ter
u-re-mi-a
u-re-tan
u-re-te-ro-re-no-sko-pi
u-re-ter
u-re-um
u-ret-ra
u-ret-ri-tis
u-ri
u-ri-a
u-ri-an
u-ri-bang
u-ri-ko-su-rik
u-ri-na-li-sis
u-ri-na-si
u-ri-ne
u-ri-no-ar
u-ri-no-me-ter
u-ri-ta
u-rik
u-rin
u-ring
u-ring-u-ring-an
u-rip
u-ris
u-rit
u-rit-an
u-ro-bi-li-no-gen
u-ro-fo-bi-a
u-ro-ge-ni-tal
u-ro-gi-ne-ko-log
u-ro-ki-na-se
u-ro-lo-gi
u-ro-lo-gis
u-ro-log
u-ro-po-da
u-ro-sko-pi
u-ru-ang-mi-rin
u-ru-gu-ai
u-rug
u-ruk
u-ruk-an
u-run
u-run-an
u-run-di
u-rung
u-rup
u-rup-u-rup
u-rup-u-rup-an
u-rus
u-rus-an
u-rus-u-rus
u-rut
u-rut-an
u-rut-u-rut
u-sa-da
u-sa-ha
u-sa-ha-wan
u-sa-li
u-sah
u-sah-kan
u-sai
u-sak
u-sam
u-sang
u-sap
u-sar
u-sat
u-ser-u-ser
u-ser-u-ser-an
u-si
u-si-a
u-si-li-mo
u-sif
u-sik
u-sik-an
u-sil
u-sil-an
u-sing
u-sir
u-sir-an
u-sis
u-su-lu-din
u-suk
u-sul
u-sul-an
u-sung
u-sung-an
u-sur
u-sus
u-sut
u-sut-an
u-ta-lo
u-ta-ma
u-ta-ra
u-ta-rid
u-tak-a-tik
u-tan
u-tang
u-tang-an
u-tar
u-tar-u-tar
u-tas
u-tas-an
u-te-ri
u-te-rus
u-ter-u-ter
u-ti-li-ta-ri-an
u-ti-li-ta-ri-an-is-me
u-ti-li-ta-ris-tis
u-ti-li-tas
u-tih
u-tik
u-to-pi-a
u-to-pis
u-top-is-me
u-tuh
u-tun
u-tus
u-tus-an
u-va
u-vu-la
u-vu-lar
u-wa-u-wa
u-wak
u-war
u-we-te
u-wi-to
u-wok
u-wung-an
u-wur
u-yah-u-yah-an
u-ye
u-yeng
u-yung
u-yut
u-zur
ul-tra-mi-kro-sko-pik
un-cu-e
un-da-e
ung-gul-meng-ung-gul-i
ur-ti-ka-ri-a
va-le-ri-a
va-ri-a
vak-si-no-fo-bi-a
ve-ho-fo-bi-a
ve-nus-tra-fo-bi-a
ve-ra-no
ver-mi-no-fo-bi-a
ves-ti-fo-bi-a
vi-a
vi-de-o
vi-di-o
vi-gi-a
vib-ri-o
vir-gi-ni-a
vir-gi-ni-ti-fo-bi-a
vit-ri-ko-fo-bi-a
vo-ka-li-a
volte-face
vul-vo-di-ni-a
wa-di-la-e
wa-la-o
wa-nu-a
wa-ri-a
wa-u-wa-u
wai-ge-o
wi-ao-e
wi-ja-ya-mu-li-a
wi-ka-fo-bi-a
wi-ra-ni-a-ga
wo-li-o
wom-bu-a
xe-ni-a
xe-no-fi-li-a
xe-no-fo-bi-a
xe-no-glo-si-a
xe-no-glo-so-fo-bi-a
xe-no-ma-ni-a
xe-ro-fi-li-a
xe-ro-fo-bi-a
xe-rof-tal-mi-a
xe-ros-to-mi-a
xi-lo-fo-bi-a
xi-ro-fo-bi-a
y-t-m
ya-nyi-o
yang-yang
yaumul-zalzalah
yin-yang
yo-gi-a
yor-da-ni-a
yus-ti-si-a
za-ka-ri-a
za-tu-a
zam-bi-a
ze-lo-fo-bi-a
zig-zag
zir-ko-ni-a
zo-di-a
zo-o-do-ma-ti-a
zo-o-fi-li-a
zo-o-fo-bi-a
ü-ber-mensch
